Missouri, session 2026, HB2507.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 290, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 290.595, to read as follows:
290.595. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Labor organization", any organization of any kind, or any agency or
employee representation committee or plan, employee association, or union in which
employees participate and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing
with employers concerning representation, collective bargaining, contract
administration, grievances or grievance procedures, labor disputes, wages, rates of
pay, hours of employment, terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid
or protection in relation to employment;
(2) "Payment grace period", the period of time between the date the new hire
employee is hired and begins employment and the date the new employee completes his
or her two-hundredth- fiftieth hour of work for such employment within which no union
dues shall be required to be paid to a labor organization;
(3) "Union dues", regular payments required to be paid to a labor organization
by members or nonmembers of the labor organization, including initiation fees, dues,
assessments, agency shop fees, contributions, expenditures, or other similar charges that
are directly related to representation, collective bargaining, contract administration,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2507 2
grievances or grievance procedures, labor disputes, or other lawful activities of the labor
organization.
2. A labor organization shall not require payment or collection of any union dues
owed by a new hire employee upon beginning employment until such new hire employee
has accrued two hundred fifty hours of work, as calculated under subsection 4 of this
section, in such employment and the two-hundred-fifty-hour payment grace period has
lapsed.
3. New hire employees shall be notified in writing with a detailed accounting of
all union dues owed to the labor organization, including one-time payments and ongoing
payments. Such accounting shall include how any variable amounts shall be calculated.
New hire employees shall be required to sign the accounting document, by handwritten
signature or electronic signature, acknowledging receipt of and agreement to the union
dues accounting on or before the first day of employment.
4. For the calculation of the two-hundred-fifty hour payment grace period under
the provisions of this section, hours of work shall include all compensable hours of work,
including all the hours worked when an employee is required to be on the employer's
premises, on duty, or at a prescribed work place; hours worked at the regular hourly
rate or regular required salaried hours during a regular shift; work that is de minimis
in nature; hours of overtime or compensory time worked; paid and unpaid job training
if not included or occurring during a regular shift; work occurring during meal breaks;
any paid or required on-the-job or work-related travel or on-call time; and any hours of
paid or unpaid leave taken during such payment grace period.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a voluntary payment or
payments of union dues by a new hire employee during the payment grace period.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede any provision of a
federal, state, or local law. This section shall not apply where this section conflicts with
or is preempted by federal law or to employment that is covered by a valid collective-
bargaining agreement or other written agreement between an employer or an employee
or an employer and a labor organization entered into before the effective date of this
section but shall apply to any new agreements and any renewals, extensions,
amendments, or modifications to any existing agreements on or after the effective
date of this section.
7. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable

HB 2507 3
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔